Hawaii statutes.
§708-8203 Telecommunication service fraud
in the second degree. (1) A person commits the offense of
telecommunication service fraud in the second degree if the person:

(a) Knowingly possesses a telecommunication service
device with the intent to obtain telecommunication service without payment of
applicable charges;

(b) Knowingly possesses written instructions or
plans to make or assemble a telecommunication service device with the intent to
use the written plans or instructions to make or assemble a device to obtain
telecommunication service without payment of applicable charges; or

(c) With the intent to defraud another of the lawful
charge for any telecommunication service, that is provided for a charge or
compensation:

(i) Uses an access device without obtaining
the consent of the holder of the access device or the telecommunication service
provider, resulting in obtaining services, the value of which does not exceed
$300 in any six-month period; or

(ii) Uses a telecommunication service device for
the purpose of obtaining telecommunication services, the value of which does
not exceed $300 in any six-month period, without obtaining the consent of the
holder of the telecommunication service device or the telecommunication service
provider.

(2) For the purposes of this section:

"Access device" means any number or
code of an existing, canceled, revoked, or nonexistent telephone number,
telephone calling card number, credit card number, account number, personal
identification number, or other credit device or method of numbering or coding
which is employed in the issuance of telephone numbers, credit numbers, or
other credit devices that can be used to obtain telecommunication service.

"Holder of access device" means a
person or organization to which an access device has been issued by a
telecommunication service provider.

(3) Telecommunication service fraud in the
second degree is a misdemeanor. [L 1987, c 268, pt of §2; am L 1993, c 120, §3;
am L 1996, c 222, §4]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next